Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2515
Board; members; qualifications.

The board shall consist of at least four members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. Three of the persons appointed shall have been engaged in rendering services to the public, teaching, or research in occupational therapy for at least five years immediately preceding their appointments. Two of the persons appointed shall be occupational therapists and one shall be either an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant and all shall be holders of active licenses issued under the Occupational Therapy Practice Act during their terms. One of the persons appointed shall be a public member who meets the requirements of section 38-165.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 43;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 62;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 178;

Laws 2001, LB 346, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 97;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 131;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6115;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 855.